src/phonology/mdf-phon.xfscript
! This file is a script for the Xerox xfst interface.
! It gives the morphophonological rules for Nenets.


! In this file, testcases are marked as follows:

! space exclmark euro space upper:lower
! Please add tests for eventual new rules or problems

! To test: in kt/mdf/src, do:
! xfst -e "source xfst-mdf.txt"
! invert net
! save s
! quit
! cat xfst-mdf.txt | grep €|cut -d" " -f3|cut -d":" -f1|lookup s


clear stack


! Definition section !
! ================== !

echo << THE DEFININTIONS >>

define VoicelessCns [ к | п | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ
                    | К | П | С | Т | Ф | Х | Ц | Ч | Ш | Щ ] ;

define NonAlveolarStops [ к | п | с | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ
                    | К | П | С | Ф | Х | Ц | Ч | Ш | Щ 
                    | б | в | г | ж | з
                    | Б | В | Г | Ж | З
                    | й | л | м | р
                    | Й | Л | М | Р ] ;

define BackCns [ к | п | ф | х | б | в | г | м 
               |  К | П | Ф | Х | Б | В | Г | М 
               | с | т | ц | з | л | р
               | С | Т | Ц | З | Л | Р ] ;

define Cns [ б | в | г | д | ж | з 
           | Б | В | Г | Д | Ж | З 
           | й | л | м | н | р 
           | Й | Л | М | Н | Р 
           | VoicelessCns ] ;

define Vws [ а | е | ё | и | о | у | ы | э | ю | я
           | А | Е | Ё | И | О | У | Ы | Э | Ю | Я ] ;

define Signs [ ъ | ь |  Ъ | Ь ] ;

define Lts [ Cns | Vws | Signs ] ;

define SUFF [ О1 з е | О1 н ц | О1 ц | О1 н ц т ы | О1 н з О1 | О1 н к | О1 н т | с т | т | О1 н | О1 н ь | О1 н д ы  ] ;

define Dummy [ %> | %^Devoice ] ;



! Rule section !
! ============ !

echo << THE RULES >>


define VowelCorrelation [ А1 -> а || [ а | я ]  %> х _ ,,
                          А1 -> а || [ Cns  %> | %> а ] х _ ,,
                          А1 -> о || [ о | ё ]  %> х _ ,,
                          А1 -> э || [ ы | э | е ]  %> х _ ] ;

define AffricatizationAfterNasal [ с -> ц || [ н | н ь ] %> _ [ ь | н О1 | О1 | т О1 ] ] ;

define DevoicingCns [ м -> п , б -> п , н -> т , д -> т  || _ ( Signs ) %> Х1 ] ;

define DevoicingX [ Х1 -> х || [ л | й | р ] %> _ [ т | т н е ] ,,
                    Х1 -> 0 || [ Vws | [ п | т ] ( Signs ) ] %> _ [ т | т н е ] ,,
                    т -> 0 || [ Cns ( Signs ) ] %> Х1 _  н е  ] ;
 !€ кал>Х1т:калхт

define ProlativeG2 [ Г2 -> г || [ б | в | г | д | ж | з | й | л | м | н | р ] ( Signs ) %> _ ,,
                     Г2 -> к || VoicelessCns ( Signs )  %> _  ,,
                    Г2 -> в || [ О1 | О2 | Vws ] %> _ ] ;

define AblativeD [ д -> т || [ VoicelessCns | д | Д ] ( Signs ) %> _ О1 ] ;

define MorphemeFinalO1Toa [ О1 -> а || _ [ .#. | %> в о к ] ,,
                        О1 -> о ||  _ %> [ SUFF [ .#. | %> в о к ] | О1 л  ] ] ;

define StemFinalO1Toa [ О2 -> о || [ к | п | ф | х | б | в | г | м ] е %> _ [ Cns ] ,,
                       е  -> 0 || [ ] _ %> О2  [ Cns ] ] ;

define MorphemeInitialO1ToZero [ О1 -> 0 || Vws %> _ ,,
                                 О1 -> о || Cns %> _ Cns ,,
                                 О1 -> о || BackCns %> _ [ Cns ] ,,
                                 О1 -> е || [ ь ] %> _  [ Cns ] ,,
                                 ь -> 0 || _ %> О1 [ Cns ] ] ;


define VowelPalatalization [ а -> я , у -> ю || й %> _ ] ;


define DummyDeletion Dummy -> 0 ;



read regex [

    VowelCorrelation
.o. AffricatizationAfterNasal
.o. DevoicingCns
.o. DevoicingX
.o. ProlativeG2
.o. AblativeD
.o. MorphemeFinalO1Toa
.o. StemFinalO1Toa
.o. MorphemeInitialO1ToZero
.o. VowelPalatalization
.o. DummyDeletion
] ;
